Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 101.
Day.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the legal day for purposes of this chapter shall begin at twelve o’clock midnight and continue until the next 12:00 midnight.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961.

§ 102.
Hours.

Fish may be taken during the open season at any hour of the day.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961.

§§ 103-106.
Repealed.

§ 107.
Handheld Spear, Speargun, Crossbow, and Bow and Arrow.

A person holding a hunting or combination license may take fish by handheld spear or speargun in accordance with 10 V.S.A. Appendix § 122. Section 122 sets forth the list of species that may be taken, the season, and the waters where the fish species
may be taken. A Handheld Spear (including “spearing” in Title 10 § 4606(e)) is a manually powered spear used from above the water’s surface. A Speargun is a pneumatic or rubber band powered device with a line not to exceed 20
feet attached to a spear, used from below the water’s surface. Spearguns shall be loaded and discharged only beneath the surface of the water and shall be used while snorkeling/freediving only. Spearing while SCUBA diving is not
permitted.

A person who holds a fishing or combination license may take fish species allowed under § 122 by bow or crossbow with line attached to arrow during the season provided and in waters designated by § 122 of these regulations.

A person who takes a fish by handheld spear, speargun, bow or crossbow with line attached to arrow, in accordance with § 122, shall keep the fish in his or her possession until the fish is permanently removed from waters of the state and used or disposed
of properly.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended 2017 Fish and Wildlife Regs, eff. Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 108.
Shooting pickerel.

A person holding a hunting or combination license may take pickerel by shooting, during the season provided therefor and in waters designated by section 122 of these regulations.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961.

§ 109.
Repealed. 2017 Fish and Wildlife Reg., eff. January 1, 2018.

§ 109a.
Repealed.

§ 110.
Repealed.

§ 111.
Repealed. 1991, No. 230 (Adj. Sess.), § 1(11).

§§ 112-114.
Repealed.

§ 114a.
Rule defining mouths of tributaries and lines between points to identify the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain.

Authority.

This rule is promulgated pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4609
.

This rule defines the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain, for reciprocal license purposes, easterly of which a Vermont fishing license is required for all individuals fifteen (15) years of age or older.

This rule shall apply to all persons who take or attempt to take fish on the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain and that portion of Lake Champlain easterly of the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain.

Purpose

The purpose of this rule is to:

Define that portion of Lake Champlain lying between the Vermont-New York State boundary and that portion of Lake Champlain lying wholly in Vermont where holders of a New York fishing license are extended reciprocal fishing privileges, and

Provide a border for the eastern side of the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain that is easy for anglers to identify, and

Ensure the conservation of the fish in the state.

The Vermont-New York Lake Champlain Border.

For the purposes of this rule, and for reciprocal fishing privileges authorized by

10 V.S.A. § 4609(b)
, the Vermont-New York Lake Champlain Border is defined as starting at a point where the Poultney River empties into the East Bay, then through the middle of the deepest channel of East Bay to the middle of
the deepest channel of Lake Champlain, then following the middle of the deepest channel of Lake Champlain in a generally northerly direction to the east of the Four Brothers Islands and the west of Grand Isle, North Hero and
Isle La Motte, to the United States border with Canada.

The Eastern Border of the Vermont Portion of Lake Champlain.

For the purposes of this rule, and for reciprocal fishing privileges authorized by

10 V.S.A. § 4609(b)
, the eastern border of the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain is defined as a line starting on the north shore of the Poultney River where it empties into East Bay, proceeding generally northerly along the shore
to the old Rutland Railroad fill on Colchester Point, then following the western side of the old Rutland Railroad fill to Allen Point on Grand Isle, continuing northerly following the western shore of Grand Isle to Tromp Point,
then across The Gut to Bow and Arrow Point, then continuing generally northerly along the western shore of North Hero to Pelots Point, then across the Alburg passage to the Point of the Tongue, and then along the western shore
of the Alburg peninsula to the United States Border with Canada. When this line crosses a tributary to Lake Champlain, the line shall proceed from the downstream most point of land on one side of the tributary to the downstream
most point of land on the other side of the tributary.

Permitted Activities.

Holders of New York fishing licenses may take fish from that portion of Lake Champlain lying between the Vermont-New York border of Lake Champlain and the eastern border of the Vermont portion of Lake Champlain as defined in Part 4.0 above provided the
State of New York grants the right to take fish to holders of Vermont fishing licenses in that portion of Lake Champlain lying between the Vermont-New York border and the New York shore.

Graphic Representation of the Mouth of a Tributary

Click to view

Click to view

Display Image

IMAGE

HISTORY:
Added 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1500, eff. Oct. 31, 2003.

§ 115.
Use of state controlled fishing access areas.

Authority

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4145(a)
which authorizes the board to make rules to “regulate the use by the public of access areas, landing areas, parking areas or of other lands or waters acquired or maintained pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4144
.”

This rule applies to use of state controlled fishing access areas and to persons, businesses, or entities that use the fishing access areas.

Purpose

The purpose of this rule is to:

Ensure current and future uses are orderly, sustainable, and in accordance with state and federal statutes and guidelines.

Manage conflict between users by clarifying authorized and prohibited activities and ensuring users share in the burdens and benefits of use.

Protect the fishing access areas for statutorily approved uses.

Definitions

Commercial Activity is any activity or service that produces income to any entity or individual.

Nonprofit Charitable Organization means an entity organized and operated exclusively for exempt purposes set forth in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Picnicking includes but is not limited to any activity that involves, cooking, grilling, food preparation and, set-up associated with eating (including setting blankets or table cloths laid on the ground).

Camping includes any activity using a tent, camper, or motor home, any activity involving preparation of an area for sleeping or, any overnight sleeping.

Group use is use actually or potentially involving 10 or more people or two or more vehicles at a time.

Parking is the leaving of motor vehicles or trailers unattended in an access area.

Motor vehicles are all vehicles propelled or drawn by power other than muscle power.

Vessel means motor boats, boats, kayaks, canoes and sail boats.

Authorized Activities

The following are authorized activities in order of priority:

Angling, ice fishing and the launching of any vessel to be used for fishing and parking of vehicles and trailers necessary for and contemporaneous with these purposes.

The launching of inboard and outboard motorboats engaging in any activity and parking of vehicles and trailers necessary for and contemporaneous with that purpose.

Trapping, hunting and parking of vehicles and boat trailers necessary for and contemporaneous with that purpose.

Launching of all non-motorized vessels not used for commercial purposes and parking of vehicles and boat trailers necessary for and contemporaneous with that purpose. Users shall launch from the designated non-motorized launch site, when such a site
is identified.

ATV’s and snowmobiles when being used solely for the purposes of ice fishing.

Permitted special uses.

Prohibited Activities

Discarding of bottles, glass, cans, paper, junk, litter, food, or any other garbage or trash.

Discarding of dead fish, wildlife or portions thereof.

Washing or cleaning of vehicles and equipment other than for the purpose of removing aquatic plants and organisms.

Washing or cleaning of fish or wildlife.

Camping.

Picnicking.

Making or maintaining fire of any kind.

Water skiing.

Swimming.

Use of snowmobiles and ATVs, except for those being utilized solely for the purpose of ice fishing.

Parking of vehicles and or trailers while the vehicle owner or user is not present at the access area or on the adjacent public waters except as otherwise permitted by the Commissioner.

Storage of vehicles and or trailers or placing of vehicles or trailers for sale.

Withdrawal of water except as authorized under paragraph 6.0.

Parking in excess of 72 consecutive hours except that the Commissioner may issue permits for longer parking when the Commissioner determines that there will be no adverse impact on authorized uses found in 4.0 above.

Commercial activity except as authorized by paragraph 7.0 below.

Activity that interferes with a priority use, such as, but not limited to the mooring or beaching of boats, using the ramp to rig a boat or boats thus obstructing use of the ramp, and the storing of boats or trailers at an access area.

Group use not specifically authorized by the Commissioner.

Launching and recovery of sailboards, rafts, snow kites, and the parking of vehicles and trailers supporting these activities.

All other activity that is not specifically permitted by this rule unless specifically authorized by the Commissioner.

Authorized Users.

Any person who is engaged in any authorized activity.

Any group that has received approval for group use in accordance with this rule.

Fire departments that have executed a Memorandum Of Agreement (MOA) with the Commissioner for the installation and use of a dry hydrant. And then, only in accordance with their MOA. Fire departments may also use Access Areas without dry hydrants as emergency
water sources to fight fires and will notify the local warden as soon as practicably possible.

Individuals participating in a fishing tournament permitted under

10 V.S.A. § 4613
.

Limited Commercial Activity

Commercial activity at fishing access areas is limited to entities and persons taking part in activities authorized by 4.1, 4.2 and 4.3 above.

Special Permits

The Commissioner may authorize special permits for entities or persons to use an access area for group use when the Commissioner determines that there will be no adverse impact on authorized priority uses.

The Commissioner may authorize the use of access areas by an educational institution or a nonprofit charitable organization conducting a fundraising event of limited duration, provided that the event will not conflict with a priority use of the access
area.

Special permits shall not be issued and may be revoked immediately for activities that substantially interfere with authorized uses.

Permit fees shall be in accordance with the schedule of fees established under

10 V.S.A. § 4132(e)
.

Speed Limit

The maximum speed on access areas shall be 15 miles per hour.

HISTORY:
Added 1962, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 641, eff. May 1, 1962; amended 1987, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 641, eff. June 4, 1987; 2006, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 641, eff. Aug. 31, 2006; 2007, Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg. No. 641, eff. Sept. 1, 2006; Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., effective May 18, 2010.

§ 116.
Atlantic salmon management in Connecticut River.

Definitions.

“Angling” means fishing with hook and line which must be personally attended.

“Fly fishing” means angling with the use of a single fly with either a single or double (side by side) hook, whose gape may not exceed 1/2 inch, dressed with hair, feathers, tinsel, thread, yarn or similar material. The use of lead core lines is prohibited.
Additional weight may not be built into the fly in its construction, as in a weighted nymph, and no additional weight or other attachments such as spinners or swivels shall be attached to the hook, leader or line, and the
use of open or closed face spinning reels, spin cast reels, free spool reels, bait casting reels or similar devices is prohibited.

“River” means the main stem of the Connecticut River from a line drawn from Griswold Point in Old Lyme, Connecticut to Lynde Point, Old Saybrook, Connecticut upstream to the base of the dam at Lake Francis in Pittsburg, New Hampshire.

“Snagging” (snatching, lifting or jigging) means the taking or attempting to take any fish by foul hooking, that is, hooking the fish in any part of the body other than inside the mouth.

“States” means the Connecticut River basin states of Connecticut, Massachusetts, New Hampshire and Vermont.

“Take” or “taking” means killing or capturing or otherwise rendering into possession.

Connecticut River Basin Atlantic Salmon License.

In accordance with the authorizing statutes, no person shall take, attempt to take, assist in taking or possess on the waters or the shores of the river or any of its tributaries any Atlantic salmon without first having obtained a Connecticut River basin
Atlantic salmon license.

Such license shall be issued by the states on forms provided by the Commission and shall be valid during the calendar year of issue.

No person shall be issued such license unless such person has first obtained the appropriate sport fishing license required by the state which is to issue the Connecticut River basin Atlantic salmon license.

Such license shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner on the outer garment at all times when angling for Atlantic salmon.

The fee for such license shall be ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50), fifty cents ($0.50) of which may be retained by the state of issuance.

Seasons, methods and limits.

No person shall take or attempt to take from the river or possess on the waters or shores of the river any Atlantic salmon except that the Commission, acting under Article VIII, Section 6 of its Statement of Practices and Procedures, when it has evidence
that sufficient numbers of Atlantic salmon have returned to the river, may declare an open season in the river or in specified sections of the river for such periods as it deems appropriate and may close such season for
cause.

Upon the declaration of an open season for Atlantic salmon in the river, the Commission shall provide, to the states, Connecticut River Atlantic salmon tags to be issued, at no additional cost, to holders of the Connecticut River basin Atlantic salmon
license in a number determined by the Commission to be the individual season creel limit. Any person taking any Atlantic salmon in the main stem of the Connecticut River shall immediately attach thereto a Connecticut River
salmon tag and the possession of an Atlantic salmon on the waters or shores of the river without such tag attached and the removal of such tag prior to preparation for consumption is prohibited.

During any open season declared by the Commission, Atlantic salmon may be taken by fly fishing only, the minimum length for Atlantic salmon shall be fifteen (15) inches and the daily and seasonal creel limit shall be as determined by the Commission upon
declaration of an open season.

Any Atlantic salmon taken under the provisions of this section must be presented for inspection within forty-eight (48) hours to an authorized agent of the fish and wildlife agency in the state in which such Atlantic salmon was taken.

The snagging of Atlantic salmon is prohibited.

The taking of Atlantic salmon with the aid of an artificial light is prohibited.

No Atlantic salmon may be taken within 250 feet of any dam or fishway.

The use of a gaff to land Atlantic salmon is prohibited.

All Atlantic salmon taken contrary to this section shall be immediately returned, without avoidable injury, to the water from which taken.

Scientific purposes. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a duly authorized state, federal, or Commission employee, acting within the scope of official employment, from taking or possessing Atlantic salmon for the purposes of research, management
or propagation.

Penalties. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to the penalties set forth in the statutes of the state in which the violation occurred. Upon conviction of any person for any violation of any provision of this section,
the Connecticut River basin license issued to such person and the right to obtain such license shall be suspended for a period of one year for the first violation, two years for the second violation and five years for the third
and subsequent violations. Upon suspension of said license, any Connecticut River Atlantic salmon tags issued under the provisions of this section shall be surrendered to the state of issuance.

Effective date. The effective date of this section shall be June 1, 1985.

HISTORY:
Added 1985, Connecticut River Atlantic Salmon Commission Regs., eff. June 1, 1985.

§ 117.
Fish propagation.

Purpose. The purpose of this regulation is to carry out the mandate of the Vermont General Assembly to control, through a permit program, the propagation of fish, 10 V.S.A. chapter 119, §§ 5207-5209. In addition, a Memorandum of Understanding of the
operation of the fish health inspection program was adopted July 21, 1992, by the Commissioners of the Fish and Wildlife Department and the Department of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Department of Fish and Wildlife will review
the Fish and Wildlife regulation governing the industry of fish propagation annually. This review will consider the recommendations of the Vermont Aquaculture Advisory Board to include testimony and data.

Scope of Regulations. The provisions of this part are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any present State law or regulation pertaining to the taking of any fish in a lawful means and lawful manner. These regulations provide for the establishment of
an application process, investigation process, permit issuance process and conditions under which the propagated species may be sold or purchased.

Definitions.

Fish. All fresh water fish and any salt water fish capable of adapting to fresh water. Also includes live fish, viable fish eggs, and viable sperm.

Propagation. To cause to multiply or breed. To increase the species, or to cause to spread.

Endangered Species. All fish named as threatened or endangered by the Federal Endangered Species Act (P.L. 93-205) and those listed as threatened or endangered pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 123.

Commissioner. Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

Department. Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

Injurious Fish. Fish determined by the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department or the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service to be a danger to or potential danger to, Vermont’s fish or wildlife.

Annual Fish Health Inspection. Annual inspection (minimum once a year) for fish pathogens using inspection procedures approved by the Department, such as those provided for in the most recent addition of the “Blue Book,” which is developed by the Fish
Health Section of the American Fisheries Society (AFS) or the most recent addition of the “Fish Health Protection Regulations Manual of Compliance,” of the Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Canada.

Fish Health Inspector. Person responsible for carrying out fish health inspections based on standards approved by the Department, such as those provided for by the Fish Health Section of the American Fisheries Society and/or the New England Salmonid
Health Guidelines.

Fish health inspectors shall have access to adequate laboratory facilities and qualified personnel to assure the prompt conduct of inspections, diagnosis, and reporting.

Fish Lot. A group of fish of the same species and age that originated from the same discrete spawning population during the same year, and are being raised on the same water source.

Permit Requirements.

A person shall not rear for sale or distribution, any species of live fish within this state without first procuring a permit from the Commissioner to do so (10 V.S.A. chapter 119, §§ 5207-5209). Persons maintaining fish in a closed rearing aquarium (no
water discharge) may request exemptions (on the fish propagation application form) from the Annual Fish Health Inspection and/or the Breeders License.

All individuals holding a Breeders License for trout and/or salmon will be required to have annual fish health inspections, conducted by a qualified fish health inspector acceptable by the Department. However, persons maintaining fish in a closed rearing
unit may be exempt from the annual fish health inspection. All fish lots on the facility shall be tested for VHS (Viral Hemorrhagic Septicemia), IPN (Infectious Pancreatic Necrosis), IHN (Infectious Hematopietic Necrosis),
BKD (Renibacterium salmoninarum), ERM (Yersinia ruckeri), Aeromonas salmonicida (Furunculosis), Myxobolus cerebralis (Whirling disease), and other disease agents, that may be deemed necessary by the Commissioner. Fish health
inspections will be scheduled by the fish health inspector. Individuals holding a Breeders License will be responsible for providing aid to help the fish health inspector with the collection of fish during the scheduled
date of the inspection.

Other species will be required to be inspected for those pathogens deemed necessary by the Commissioner with the approval of the Commissioner of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

Sample sizes for each lot must be approved by the Department such as those provided for by the Fish Health Section of the (AFS) and/or the New England Salmonid Health Guidelines. (Mixed fish lots will be sampled according to the discretion of the Department.)

If at any time fish are found to be infected with the causative agents of VHS (Viral Hemorrhagic Septicemia), IHN (Infectious Hematopoietic Necrosis), Whirling Disease (Myxobolus cerebralis) and/or other diseases as determined by the Commissioner to be
a serious threat to the fishery resources of the State of Vermont, the Commissioner shall have the authority to impose an immediate prohibition on moving any fish. During the prohibition a compliance agreement stating the
appropriate procedures for the disposal of fish and the disinfection of the facility shall be determined by the Department’s appropriate representative and in consultation with the owner/operator in cooperation with a nonaffiliated
fish health specialist. Other diseases as determined by the Commissioner, with the approval of the Commissioner of Agriculture, Food and Markets, to be a serious threat to the fisheries resources of the State of Vermont
may also result in this action.

The action shall be designed to bring the least amount of economic hardship to the affected party, while affording maximum protection to other operators, growers, and the fishery resources of the State of Vermont.

Application. (5) (A) Application.

Issuance of Permit.

(1)
The applicant for a Breeders License shall apply on a form supplied by the Department and include appropriate fee. Such forms must be complete in all respects and shall contain the following information:

License number.

A description of the land or water to be utilized for propagation.

Information on whether the applicant is the owner or lessee of such lands or waters. If the applicant is not the owner, list the owner’s name and address.

A map of the property and waters indicating any ingress and egress to his/her waters by public waters.

A map of existing and/or proposed fish rearing units, including water sources. Unit type, volume, and available water supply (gallons per minute) should be included.

Reason for propagating species: food fish or live sale (percent of each).

The complete name, common and scientific, of each fish species will be listed on the application.

A copy of the latest annual fish health inspection report and the fish health inspection reports of fish lots introduced to the station in the past year must be included. (See Page 2, B through E.)

The applicant shall sign the application.

A report shall be sent to the Department 30 days prior to the anniversary date of initial issuance. The report shall have an annual accounting (since submission of previous application) of all fish lots and/or eggs purchased or obtained, from who purchased
or obtained, number, kind, and size of fish and/or eggs. The applicant shall sign the report. (Failure to comply will disqualify the permittee for issuance of a subsequent permit.)

(2)
Upon receipt of the application the Department shall, within 30 working days, investigate and determine if the information on the application is correct and approve or deny the application.

Breeders Licenses will not be issued for: Endangered Species or Injurious Fish.

If the permit application is denied, the applicant may appeal to the Commissioner for a hearing pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

Conditional permits may be issued, based on specifications and requirements set forth by the Department.

All Breeders Licenses shall expire on the anniversary date of initial issuance. Subsequent applications for a propagation permit will, if approved, receive the same breeders permit number assigned in the past.

(6)

Marking—Invoices.
All persons licensed to propagate fish pursuant to this part shall provide an invoice and/or mark any box, carton, barrel, can, or other type of container or wrapper containing any propagated fish with
the following information:

(a)
Name and address of propagator, supplier, or producer

(b)
License number

(c)
Species

(d)
Number and/or total weight.

HISTORY:
Added 1994, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1004, eff. March 26, 1994.

§ 118.
Repealed by order of the commissioner.

§ 119.
Filleting fish.

No species of fish that has a length limit restriction shall be filleted or altered to restrict the determination of length while on any body of water, except as follows:

If fish are to be consumed or filleted on the water, the fillets may be removed, but the head, vertebrae, and tail must be retained and remain intact to determine legal length.

HISTORY:
Added 1991, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 943, eff. Jan. 5, 1991.

§ 120.
Special regulations—Noyes Pond.

Fishing in Noyes Pond shall be by fly fishing only. (Flies shall be artificial only.)

The flies shall be single hook only, and must be either barbless or the barb filed or crimped down.

Fishing from the shore of Noyes Pond and its tributaries is prohibited.

Fishing is permitted only between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and one (1) hour after official sunset.

HISTORY:
Added 1991, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 987, eff. Aug. 9, 1991.